Washington statutes.
RCW 39.84.140

Subleases and assignments.

A lessee or contracting party under a sale contract or loan agreement shall not be required to be the eventual user of an industrial development facility if any sublessee or assignee assumes all of the obligations of the lessee or contracting party under the lease, sale contract, or loan agreement, but the lessee or contracting party or their successors shall remain primarily liable for all of its obligations under the lease, sale contract, or loan agreement and the use of the industrial development facility shall be consistent with the purposes of this chapter.

[ 1981 c 300 s 14.]